Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-3105
Threat assessment team; training.

The department shall provide training for the members of any threat assessment team serving a public or nonpublic school. Such training shall provide the knowledge and skill to allow threat assessment teams to work collaboratively to conduct threat assessments, engage in crisis intervention, increase awareness of concerning behavior among school staff, students, and the public, and interrupt violence in the planning stage to thwart potential harm to persons and property. Such training shall be reasonable in length.

Laws 2021, LB322, § 5;

Laws 2024, LB1329, § 87.
July 19, 2024